Illinois, session 104th, HB2648.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Common Interest Community Association Act 5is amended by changing Section 1-30 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 160/1-30)7    Sec. 1-30. Board duties and obligations; records. 8    (a) The board shall meet at least 4 times annually. 9    (b) A common interest community association may not enter 10into a contract with a current board member, or with a 11corporation, limited liability company, or partnership in 12which a board member or a member of his or her immediate family 13has 25% or more interest, unless notice of intent to enter into 14the contract is given to members within 20 days after a 15decision is made to enter into the contract and the members are 16afforded an opportunity by filing a petition, signed by 20% of 17the membership, for an election to approve or disapprove the 18contract; such petition shall be filed within 20 days after 19such notice and such election shall be held within 30 days 20after filing the petition. For purposes of this subsection, a 21board member's immediate family means the board member's 22spouse, parents, siblings, and children.23    (c) The bylaws or operating agreement shall provide for   HB2648- 2 -LRB104 09657 JRC 19723 b1the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common areas 2and payments therefor, including the method of approving 3payment vouchers.4    (d) (Blank).5    (e) The association may engage the services of a manager 6or management company.7    (f) The association shall have one class of membership 8unless the declaration, bylaws, or operating agreement provide 9otherwise; however, this subsection (f) shall not be construed 10to limit the operation of subsection (c) of Section 1-20 of 11this Act.12    (g) The board shall have the power, after notice and an 13opportunity to be heard, to levy and collect reasonable fines 14from members or unit owners for violations of the declaration, 15bylaws, operating agreement, and rules and regulations of the 16common interest community association.17    (h) Other than attorney's fees and court or arbitration 18costs, no fees pertaining to the collection of a member's or 19unit owner's financial obligation to the association, 20including fees charged by a manager or managing agent, shall 21be added to and deemed a part of a member's or unit owner's 22respective share of the common expenses unless: (i) the 23managing agent fees relate to the costs to collect common 24expenses for the association; (ii) the fees are set forth in a 25contract between the managing agent and the association; and 26(iii) the authority to add the management fees to a member's or   HB2648- 3 -LRB104 09657 JRC 19723 b1unit owner's respective share of the common expenses is 2specifically stated in the declaration, bylaws, or operating 3agreement of the association.4    (i) Board records.5        (1) The board shall maintain the following records of 6    the association and make them available for examination 7    and copying at convenient hours of weekdays by any member 8    or unit owner in a common interest community subject to 9    the authority of the board, their mortgagees, and their 10    duly authorized agents or attorneys:11            (i) Copies of the recorded declaration, other 12        community instruments, other duly recorded covenants 13        and bylaws and any amendments, articles of 14        incorporation, articles of organization, annual 15        reports, and any rules and regulations adopted by the 16        board shall be available. Prior to the organization of 17        the board, the developer shall maintain and make 18        available the records set forth in this paragraph (i) 19        for examination and copying.20            (ii) Detailed and accurate records in 21        chronological order of the receipts and expenditures 22        affecting the common areas, specifying and itemizing 23        the maintenance and repair expenses of the common 24        areas and any other expenses incurred, and copies of 25        all contracts, leases, or other agreements entered 26        into by the board shall be maintained.  HB2648- 4 -LRB104 09657 JRC 19723 b1            (iii) The minutes of all meetings of the board 2        which shall be maintained for not less than 7 years.3            (iv) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 4        ballots and proxies related thereto, if any, for any 5        election held for the board and for any other matters 6        voted on by the members, which shall be maintained for 7        not less than one year.8            (v) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 9        such other records of the board as are available for 10        inspection by members of a not-for-profit corporation 11        pursuant to Section 107.75 of the General Not For 12        Profit Corporation Act of 1986 shall be maintained.13            (vi) With respect to units owned by a land trust, a 14        living trust, or other legal entity, the trustee, 15        officer, or manager of the entity may designate, in 16        writing, a person to cast votes on behalf of the member 17        or unit owner and a designation shall remain in effect 18        until a subsequent document is filed with the 19        association.20            (vii) Any reserve study. 21        (2) Where a request for records under this subsection 22    is made in writing to the board or its agent, failure to 23    provide the requested record or to respond within 30 days 24    shall be deemed a denial by the board.25        (3) A reasonable fee not to exceed $375 may be charged 26    by the board for the cost of retrieving and copying   HB2648- 5 -LRB104 09657 JRC 19723 b1    records properly requested. The board may charge an 2    additional rush fee of not to exceed $100 if the records 3    are needed within 72 hours of the request being made. Any 4    fees charged shall be accompanied by an itemized statement 5    detailing the basis of the fees. Beginning one year after 6    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 7    General Assembly, the $375 fee shall be increased or 8    decreased, as applicable, by a percentage equal to the 9    percentage change in the consumer price index-u during the 10    preceding 12-month calendar year. "Consumer price index-u" 11    means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 12    Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 13    measures the average change in prices of goods and 14    services purchased by all urban consumers, United States 15    city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 16        (4) If the board fails to provide records properly 17    requested under paragraph (1) of this subsection (i) 18    within the time period provided in that paragraph (1), the 19    member may seek appropriate relief and shall be entitled 20    to an award of reasonable attorney's fees and costs if the 21    member prevails and the court finds that such failure is 22    due to the acts or omissions of the board of managers or 23    the board of directors.24    (j) The board shall have standing and capacity to act in a 25representative capacity in relation to matters involving the 26common areas or more than one unit, on behalf of the members or   HB2648- 6 -LRB104 09657 JRC 19723 b1unit owners as their interests may appear.2    (k) The board may contract with the highway commissioner 3of a road district in which the association is located, if the 4association comprises 50% of the population or greater of the 5township or road district, to furnish materials related to the 6maintenance or repair of roads. Any such purchases shall be 7included in the board's finance report as outlined in Section 81-45. 9(Source: P.A. 102-921, eff. 5-27-22; 103-486, eff. 1-1-24.)